Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Dissolution — Legal Separation
403.212.
Child support guidelines — Administrative regulation establishing a child support obligation worksheet, manual with examples on cabinet Web site — Terms to be applied in calculations — Table.

The following provisions and child support table shall be the child support guidelines established for the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall:

Promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A establishing a child support obligation worksheet; and

Make accessible on its Web site a manual providing examples or illustrations of the application of the child support guidelines and the child support obligation worksheet.

For the purposes of the child support guidelines:

“Income” means actual gross income of the parent if employed to full capacity or potential income if unemployed or underemployed;

“Gross income” includes income from any source, except as excluded in this subsection, and includes but is not limited to income from salaries, wages, retirement and pension funds, commissions, bonuses, dividends, severance pay, pensions, interest, trust income, annuities, capital gains, Social Security benefits, workers’ compensation benefits, unemployment insurance benefits, disability insurance benefits, Supplemental Security Income (SSI), gifts, prizes, and alimony or maintenance received. Specifically excluded are benefits received from means-tested public assistance programs, including but not limited to public assistance as defined under Title IV-A of the Federal Social Security Act, and food stamps;

For income from self-employment, rent, royalties, proprietorship of a business, or joint ownership of a partnership or closely held corporation, “gross income” means gross receipts minus ordinary and necessary expenses required for self-employment or business operation. Straight-line depreciation, using Internal Revenue Service (IRS) guidelines, shall be the only allowable method of calculating depreciation expense in determining gross income. Specifically excluded from ordinary and necessary expenses for purposes of this guideline shall be investment tax credits or any other business expenses inappropriate for determining gross income for purposes of calculating child support. Income and expenses from self-employment or operation of a business shall be carefully reviewed to determine an appropriate level of gross income available to the parent to satisfy a child support obligation. In most cases, this amount will differ from a determination of business income for tax purposes. Expense reimbursement or in-kind payments received by a parent in the course of employment, self-employment, or operation of a business or personal use of business property or payments of expenses by a business, shall be counted as income if they are significant and reduce personal living expenses such as a company or business car, free housing, reimbursed meals, or club dues;

“Self-support reserve” means a low-income adjustment amount to the obligated parent of nine hundred fifteen dollars ($915) per month that considers the subsistence needs of the obligor with a limited ability to pay in accordance with 45 C.F.R. sec. 302.56(c)(1)(ii), and as applied under subsection (5) of this section;

If there is a finding that a parent is voluntarily unemployed or underemployed, child support shall be calculated based on a determination of potential income, except that a finding of voluntary unemployment or underemployment and a determination of potential income shall not be made for a parent who is incarcerated, physically or mentally incapacitated, or is caring for a very young child, age three (3) or younger, for whom the parents owe a joint legal responsibility;

A court may find a parent is voluntarily unemployed or underemployed without finding that the parent intended to avoid or reduce the child support obligation; and

Imputation of potential income, when applicable, shall include consideration of the following circumstances of the parents, to the extent known:

Assets and residence;

Employment, earning history, and job skills;

Educational level, literacy, age, health, and criminal record that could impair the ability to gain or continue employment;

Record of seeking work;

Local labor market, including availability of employment for which the parent may be qualified and employable;

Prevailing earnings in the local labor market; and

Other relevant background factors, including employment barriers;

“Obligor” has the same meaning as in KRS

205.710

;

“Imputed child support obligation” means the amount of child support the parent would be required to pay from application of the child support guidelines;

Income statements of the parents shall be verified by documentation of both current and past income. Suitable documentation shall include, but shall not be limited to, income tax returns, paystubs, employer statements, or receipts and expenses if self-employed;

“Combined monthly adjusted parental gross income” means the combined monthly gross incomes of both parents, less any of the following payments made by the parent:

The amount of pre-existing orders for current maintenance for prior spouses to the extent payment is actually made and the amount of current maintenance, if any, ordered paid in the proceeding before the court;

The amount of pre-existing orders of current child support for prior-born children to the extent payment is actually made under those orders; and

A deduction for the support to the extent payment is made, if a parent is legally responsible for and is actually providing support for other prior-born children who are not the subject of a particular proceeding. If the prior-born children reside with that parent, an “imputed child support obligation” shall be allowed in the amount which would result from application of the guidelines for the support of the prior-born children; and

“Split custody arrangement” means a situation where each parent has sole custody and decision-making authority while the child or children is in his or her residence. Visitation only occurs when the child is in residence with the other parent.

Any child support obligation shall be calculated by using the number of children for whom the parents share a joint legal responsibility.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the child support obligation set forth in the child support guidelines table shall be divided between the parents in proportion to their combined monthly adjusted parental gross income.

The child support obligation of an obligated parent whose monthly adjusted gross income is equal to or less than the amounts in subparagraphs 1. to 5. of this paragraph shall be calculated using the monthly adjusted gross income of the obligated parent alone to provide for the self— support reserve. The following monthly adjusted gross income amounts shall qualify an individual for the self-support reserve:

One thousand one hundred dollars ($1,100) with one (1) child;

One thousand three hundred dollars ($1,300) with two (2) children;

One thousand four hundred dollars ($1,400) with three (3) children;

One thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) with four (4) or five (5) children; or

One thousand six hundred dollars ($1,600) with six (6) or more children.

The obligated parent shall pay the lesser support amount calculated in accordance with:

Paragraph (a) of this subsection;

Paragraph (b) of this subsection; and

As determined under KRS

403.2121

if the shared parenting time credit is applicable.

The minimum amount of child support shall be sixty dollars ($60) per month, except as provided in KRS 403.2121(3).

The court may use its judicial discretion in determining child support in circumstances where combined adjusted parental gross income exceeds the uppermost levels of the guideline table.

The child support obligation in a split custody arrangement shall be calculated in the following manner:

Two (2) separate child support obligation worksheets shall be prepared, one (1) for each household, using the number of children born of the relationship in each separate household, rather than the total number of children born of the relationship.

The parent with the greater monthly obligation amount shall pay the difference between the obligation amounts, as determined by the worksheets, to the other parent.

The child support guidelines table is as follows:

COMBINED MONTHLY ADJUSTED PARENTAL GROSS INCOME ONE CHILD TWO CHILDREN THREE FOUR FIVE SIX OR MORE $0 $60 $60 $60 $60 $60 $60 100 60 60 60 60 60 60 200 60 60 60 60 60 60 300 60 60 60 60 60 60 400 60 60 60 60 60 60 500 60 60 60 60 60 60 600 60 60 60 60 60 60 700 60 60 60 60 60 60 800 60 60 60 60 60 60 900 60 60 60 60 60 60 1,000 85 85 85 85 85 85 1,100 148 150 152 154 155 157 1,200 200 231 234 237 239 242 1,300 216 312 316 320 323 327 1,400 231 339 398 403 407 412 1,500 247 362 437 486 491 497 1,600 262 384 464 518 570 582 1,700 277 406 491 548 603 655 1,800 292 428 517 578 635 691 1,900 307 450 544 607 668 726 2,000 322 472 570 637 701 762 2,100 337 494 597 667 734 797 2,200 352 516 624 697 766 833 2,300 367 538 650 726 799 869 2,400 382 560 677 756 832 904 2,500 397 582 704 786 865 940 2,600 412 604 730 816 897 975 2,700 427 626 757 845 930 1,011 2,800 442 648 783 875 963 1,046 2,900 457 670 810 905 995 1,082 3,000 472 692 837 935 1,028 1,118 3,100 487 714 863 964 1,061 1,153 3,200 502 737 890 994 1,094 1,189 3,300 517 759 917 1,024 1,126 1,224 3,400 532 781 943 1,054 1,159 1,260 3,500 547 803 970 1,083 1,192 1,295 3,600 562 825 997 1,113 1,224 1,331 3,700 577 847 1,023 1,143 1,257 1,367 3,800 592 869 1,050 1,173 1,290 1,402 3,900 607 891 1,076 1,202 1,323 1,438 4,000 621 912 1,102 1,230 1,353 1,471 4,100 634 931 1,125 1,256 1,382 1,502 4,200 647 950 1,148 1,282 1,410 1,533 4,300 660 969 1,171 1,308 1,439 1,564 4,400 673 988 1,194 1,334 1,467 1,595 4,500 686 1,007 1,217 1,359 1,495 1,625 4,600 699 1,026 1,240 1,385 1,524 1,656 4,700 712 1,045 1,263 1,411 1,552 1,687 4,800 725 1,064 1,286 1,437 1,580 1,718 4,900 738 1,084 1,309 1,463 1,609 1,749 5,000 751 1,103 1,332 1,488 1,637 1,780 5,100 764 1,122 1,356 1,514 1,666 1,810 5,200 777 1,141 1,379 1,540 1,694 1,841 5,300 790 1,160 1,402 1,566 1,722 1,872 5,400 799 1,172 1,415 1,581 1,739 1,890 5,500 805 1,177 1,419 1,585 1,744 1,896 5,600 810 1,181 1,423 1,590 1,749 1,901 5,700 815 1,186 1,427 1,594 1,753 1,906 5,800 820 1,191 1,431 1,598 1,758 1,911 5,900 825 1,195 1,435 1,603 1,763 1,916 6,000 831 1,200 1,439 1,607 1,768 1,922 6,100 837 1,208 1,449 1,618 1,780 1,935 6,200 844 1,217 1,459 1,629 1,792 1,948 6,300 851 1,226 1,469 1,641 1,805 1,962 6,400 858 1,234 1,479 1,652 1,817 1,975 6,500 865 1,243 1,489 1,663 1,829 1,988 6,600 871 1,251 1,499 1,674 1,841 2,002 6,700 881 1,263 1,513 1,690 1,859 2,021 6,800 892 1,278 1,530 1,709 1,880 2,044 6,900 903 1,292 1,548 1,729 1,902 2,067 7,000 914 1,306 1,565 1,748 1,923 2,090 7,100 925 1,320 1,582 1,767 1,944 2,113 7,200 935 1,335 1,600 1,787 1,965 2,136 7,300 946 1,348 1,616 1,805 1,986 2,159 7,400 954 1,360 1,630 1,820 2,003 2,177 7,500 962 1,372 1,643 1,836 2,019 2,195 7,600 969 1,384 1,657 1,851 2,036 2,213 7,700 977 1,396 1,670 1,866 2,052 2,231 7,800 984 1,407 1,683 1,880 2,068 2,248 7,900 991 1,419 1,696 1,895 2,084 2,266 8,000 996 1,426 1,704 1,903 2,094 2,276 8,100 1,000 1,429 1,709 1,908 2,099 2,282 8,200 1,004 1,433 1,713 1,914 2,105 2,288 8,300 1,008 1,437 1,718 1,919 2,110 2,294 8,400 1,012 1,441 1,722 1,924 2,116 2,300 8,500 1,016 1,444 1,727 1,929 2,122 2,306 8,600 1,020 1,448 1,731 1,934 2,127 2,312 8,700 1,026 1,456 1,740 1,944 2,138 2,324 8,800 1,033 1,464 1,749 1,953 2,149 2,336 8,900 1,039 1,472 1,758 1,963 2,160 2,347 9,000 1,046 1,480 1,766 1,973 2,170 2,359 9,100 1,052 1,488 1,775 1,983 2,181 2,371 9,200 1,059 1,496 1,784 1,993 2,192 2,382 9,300 1,065 1,502 1,792 2,002 2,202 2,393 9,400 1,070 1,507 1,799 2,010 2,211 2,403 9,500 1,075 1,511 1,807 2,018 2,220 2,413 9,600 1,080 1,516 1,814 2,026 2,229 2,423 9,700 1,085 1,520 1,822 2,035 2,238 2,433 9,800 1,090 1,524 1,829 2,043 2,247 2,443 9,900 1,094 1,529 1,836 2,051 2,256 2,453 10,000 1,099 1,533 1,844 2,059 2,265 2,463 10,100 1,104 1,538 1,851 2,068 2,275 2,472 10,200 1,109 1,542 1,859 2,076 2,284 2,482 10,300 1,115 1,549 1,867 2,086 2,294 2,494 10,400 1,123 1,560 1,878 2,098 2,308 2,509 10,500 1,130 1,571 1,889 2,110 2,321 2,523 10,600 1,137 1,582 1,900 2,123 2,335 2,538 10,700 1,145 1,593 1,911 2,135 2,349 2,553 10,800 1,152 1,604 1,922 2,147 2,362 2,568 10,900 1,159 1,615 1,933 2,160 2,376 2,582 11,000 1,167 1,626 1,944 2,172 2,389 2,597 11,100 1,174 1,637 1,956 2,185 2,403 2,612 11,200 1,182 1,649 1,968 2,198 2,418 2,628 11,300 1,191 1,661 1,980 2,212 2,433 2,644 11,400 1,199 1,673 1,992 2,225 2,448 2,660 11,500 1,207 1,685 2,004 2,239 2,462 2,677 11,600 1,215 1,695 2,016 2,252 2,477 2,693 11,700 1,222 1,705 2,029 2,266 2,493 2,710 11,800 1,229 1,714 2,041 2,280 2,508 2,726 11,900 1,237 1,723 2,054 2,294 2,523 2,743 12,000 1,244 1,732 2,066 2,308 2,539 2,759 12,100 1,252 1,742 2,078 2,322 2,554 2,776 12,200 1,259 1,751 2,091 2,336 2,569 2,793 12,300 1,267 1,760 2,103 2,349 2,584 2,809 12,400 1,274 1,769 2,116 2,363 2,600 2,826 12,500 1,282 1,778 2,128 2,377 2,615 2,842 12,600 1,289 1,788 2,141 2,391 2,630 2,859 12,700 1,296 1,797 2,153 2,405 2,645 2,876 12,800 1,304 1,806 2,165 2,419 2,661 2,892 12,900 1,311 1,815 2,178 2,433 2,676 2,909 13,000 1,319 1,825 2,190 2,447 2,691 2,925 13,100 1,326 1,834 2,203 2,461 2,707 2,942 13,200 1,334 1,843 2,215 2,474 2,722 2,959 13,300 1,341 1,852 2,228 2,488 2,737 2,975 13,400 1,348 1,861 2,238 2,500 2,750 2,990 13,500 1,353 1,868 2,247 2,510 2,761 3,001 13,600 1,359 1,875 2,255 2,519 2,771 3,012 13,700 1,364 1,882 2,264 2,529 2,781 3,023 13,800 1,370 1,889 2,272 2,538 2,792 3,035 13,900 1,375 1,896 2,281 2,547 2,802 3,046 14,000 1,381 1,903 2,289 2,557 2,812 3,057 14,100 1,386 1,910 2,297 2,566 2,822 3,068 14,200 1,391 1,916 2,304 2,574 2,831 3,078 14,300 1,396 1,922 2,312 2,582 2,841 3,088 14,400 1,401 1,929 2,319 2,591 2,850 3,098 14,500 1,406 1,935 2,327 2,599 2,859 3,108 14,600 1,410 1,941 2,334 2,607 2,868 3,118 14,700 1,415 1,947 2,342 2,616 2,877 3,128 14,800 1,420 1,954 2,349 2,624 2,886 3,138 14,900 1,425 1,960 2,357 2,632 2,896 3,147 15,000 1,430 1,966 2,364 2,641 2,905 3,157 15,100 1,435 1,972 2,371 2,649 2,914 3,167 15,200 1,440 1,978 2,379 2,657 2,923 3,177 15,300 1,444 1,985 2,386 2,666 2,932 3,187 15,400 1,449 1,991 2,394 2,674 2,941 3,197 15,500 1,454 1,997 2,401 2,682 2,950 3,207 15,600 1,459 2,003 2,409 2,691 2,960 3,217 15,700 1,464 2,010 2,416 2,699 2,969 3,227 15,800 1,469 2,016 2,424 2,707 2,978 3,237 15,900 1,474 2,022 2,431 2,715 2,987 3,247 16,000 1,478 2,028 2,439 2,724 2,996 3,257 16,100 1,484 2,035 2,445 2,732 3,005 3,266 16,200 1,490 2,041 2,452 2,739 3,013 3,275 16,300 1,495 2,047 2,459 2,747 3,022 3,285 16,400 1,501 2,053 2,466 2,755 3,030 3,294 16,500 1,506 2,059 2,473 2,763 3,039 3,303 16,600 1,512 2,065 2,480 2,770 3,047 3,313 16,700 1,518 2,071 2,487 2,778 3,056 3,322 16,800 1,523 2,077 2,494 2,786 3,065 3,331 16,900 1,529 2,083 2,501 2,794 3,073 3,340 17,000 1,534 2,089 2,508 2,801 3,082 3,350 17,100 1,540 2,095 2,515 2,809 3,090 3,359 17,200 1,545 2,102 2,522 2,817 3,099 3,368 17,300 1,551 2,108 2,529 2,825 3,107 3,378 17,400 1,557 2,114 2,536 2,832 3,116 3,387 17,500 1,562 2,120 2,543 2,840 3,124 3,396 17,600 1,568 2,126 2,550 2,848 3,133 3,405 17,700 1,573 2,132 2,557 2,856 3,141 3,415 17,800 1,579 2,138 2,563 2,863 3,149 3,423 17,900 1,584 2,144 2,570 2,870 3,157 3,432 18,000 1,589 2,149 2,576 2,878 3,166 3,441 18,100 1,595 2,155 2,583 2,885 3,174 3,450 18,200 1,600 2,161 2,590 2,893 3,182 3,459 18,300 1,605 2,167 2,596 2,900 3,190 3,467 18,400 1,611 2,173 2,603 2,907 3,198 3,476 18,500 1,616 2,178 2,609 2,915 3,206 3,485 18,600 1,621 2,184 2,616 2,922 3,214 3,494 18,700 1,627 2,190 2,623 2,929 3,222 3,503 18,800 1,632 2,196 2,629 2,937 3,231 3,512 18,900 1,637 2,202 2,636 2,944 3,239 3,520 19,000 1,642 2,207 2,642 2,952 3,247 3,529 19,100 1,648 2,213 2,649 2,959 3,255 3,538 19,200 1,653 2,219 2,656 2,966 3,263 3,547 19,300 1,658 2,225 2,662 2,974 3,271 3,556 19,400 1,664 2,231 2,669 2,981 3,279 3,565 19,500 1,669 2,236 2,675 2,989 3,287 3,573 19,600 1,674 2,242 2,682 2,996 3,295 3,582 19,700 1,680 2,248 2,689 3,003 3,304 3,591 19,800 1,685 2,254 2,695 3,011 3,312 3,600 19,900 1,690 2,260 2,702 3,018 3,320 3,609 20,000 1,696 2,265 2,709 3,025 3,328 3,617 20,100 1,701 2,271 2,715 3,033 3,336 3,626 20,200 1,706 2,277 2,722 3,040 3,344 3,635 20,300 1,710 2,282 2,728 3,047 3,352 3,643 20,400 1,713 2,287 2,733 3,053 3,358 3,651 20,500 1,717 2,292 2,739 3,059 3,365 3,658 20,600 1,720 2,297 2,745 3,066 3,372 3,666 20,700 1,723 2,302 2,750 3,072 3,379 3,673 20,800 1,726 2,307 2,756 3,078 3,386 3,681 20,900 1,730 2,313 2,761 3,084 3,393 3,688 21,000 1,733 2,318 2,767 3,091 3,400 3,695 21,100 1,736 2,323 2,773 3,097 3,407 3,703 21,200 1,739 2,328 2,778 3,103 3,413 3,710 21,300 1,743 2,333 2,784 3,109 3,420 3,718 21,400 1,746 2,338 2,789 3,116 3,427 3,725 21,500 1,749 2,343 2,795 3,122 3,434 3,733 21,600 1,752 2,348 2,801 3,128 3,441 3,740 21,700 1,756 2,353 2,806 3,134 3,448 3,748 21,800 1,759 2,358 2,812 3,141 3,455 3,755 21,900 1,762 2,363 2,817 3,147 3,462 3,763 22,000 1,765 2,368 2,823 3,153 3,469 3,770 22,100 1,769 2,373 2,829 3,160 3,475 3,778 22,200 1,772 2,378 2,834 3,166 3,482 3,785 22,300 1,775 2,383 2,840 3,172 3,489 3,793 22,400 1,778 2,388 2,845 3,178 3,496 3,800 22,500 1,782 2,393 2,851 3,185 3,503 3,808 22,600 1,785 2,398 2,857 3,191 3,510 3,815 22,700 1,788 2,403 2,862 3,197 3,517 3,823 22,800 1,791 2,408 2,868 3,203 3,524 3,830 22,900 1,795 2,413 2,873 3,210 3,531 3,838 23,000 1,798 2,418 2,879 3,216 3,537 3,845 23,100 1,801 2,423 2,885 3,222 3,544 3,853 23,200 1,804 2,429 2,890 3,228 3,551 3,860 23,300 1,808 2,434 2,896 3,235 3,558 3,868 23,400 1,811 2,439 2,901 3,241 3,565 3,875 23,500 1,814 2,444 2,907 3,247 3,572 3,883 23,600 1,817 2,449 2,913 3,253 3,579 3,890 23,700 1,821 2,454 2,918 3,260 3,586 3,898 23,800 1,824 2,459 2,924 3,266 3,593 3,905 23,900 1,827 2,464 2,929 3,272 3,599 3,913 24,000 1,830 2,469 2,935 3,278 3,606 3,920 24,100 1,834 2,474 2,941 3,285 3,613 3,928 24,200 1,837 2,479 2,946 3,291 3,620 3,935 24,300 1,840 2,484 2,952 3,297 3,627 3,943 24,400 1,843 2,489 2,957 3,304 3,634 3,950 24,500 1,847 2,494 2,963 3,310 3,641 3,957 24,600 1,850 2,499 2,969 3,316 3,648 3,965 24,700 1,853 2,504 2,974 3,322 3,655 3,972 24,800 1,856 2,509 2,980 3,329 3,661 3,980 24,900 1,860 2,514 2,986 3,335 3,668 3,987 25,000 1,863 2,519 2,991 3,341 3,675 3,995 25,100 1,866 2,524 2,997 3,347 3,682 4,002 25,200 1,869 2,529 3,002 3,354 3,689 4,010 25,300 1,873 2,534 3,008 3,360 3,696 4,017 25,400 1,876 2,540 3,014 3,366 3,703 4,025 25,500 1,879 2,545 3,019 3,372 3,710 4,032 25,600 1,882 2,550 3,025 3,379 3,716 4,040 25,700 1,886 2,555 3,030 3,385 3,723 4,047 25,800 1,889 2,560 3,036 3,391 3,730 4,055 25,900 1,892 2,565 3,042 3,397 3,737 4,062 26,000 1,895 2,570 3,047 3,404 3,744 4,070 26,100 1,899 2,575 3,053 3,410 3,751 4,077 26,200 1,902 2,580 3,058 3,416 3,758 4,085 26,300 1,905 2,585 3,064 3,422 3,765 4,092 26,400 1,908 2,590 3,070 3,429 3,772 4,100 26,500 1,912 2,595 3,075 3,435 3,778 4,107 26,600 1,915 2,600 3,081 3,441 3,785 4,115 26,700 1,918 2,605 3,086 3,447 3,792 4,122 26,800 1,921 2,610 3,092 3,454 3,799 4,130 26,900 1,925 2,615 3,098 3,460 3,806 4,137 27,000 1,928 2,620 3,103 3,466 3,813 4,145 27,100 1,931 2,625 3,109 3,473 3,820 4,152 27,200 1,934 2,630 3,114 3,479 3,827 4,160 27,300 1,938 2,635 3,120 3,485 3,834 4,167 27,400 1,941 2,640 3,126 3,491 3,840 4,175 27,500 1,944 2,645 3,131 3,498 3,847 4,182 27,600 1,948 2,650 3,137 3,504 3,854 4,190 27,700 1,951 2,656 3,142 3,510 3,861 4,197 27,800 1,954 2,661 3,148 3,516 3,868 4,205 27,900 1,957 2,666 3,154 3,523 3,875 4,212 28,000 1,961 2,671 3,159 3,529 3,882 4,219 28,100 1,964 2,676 3,165 3,535 3,889 4,227 28,200 1,967 2,681 3,170 3,541 3,896 4,234 28,300 1,970 2,686 3,176 3,548 3,902 4,242 28,400 1,972 2,689 3,179 3,551 3,907 4,247 28,500 1,974 2,691 3,182 3,555 3,911 4,251 28,600 1,976 2,694 3,185 3,558 3,914 4,255 28,700 1,978 2,696 3,188 3,561 3,918 4,259 28,800 1,980 2,699 3,191 3,565 3,922 4,263 28,900 1,982 2,701 3,194 3,568 3,926 4,268 29,000 1,984 2,704 3,197 3,571 3,930 4,272 29,100 1,986 2,707 3,200 3,575 3,934 4,276 29,200 1,988 2,709 3,203 3,578 3,938 4,280 29,300 1,990 2,712 3,206 3,581 3,941 4,284 29,400 1,992 2,714 3,209 3,584 3,945 4,289 29,500 1,993 2,717 3,212 3,588 3,949 4,293 29,600 1,995 2,719 3,215 3,591 3,953 4,297 29,700 1,997 2,722 3,218 3,594 3,957 4,301 29,800 1,999 2,724 3,221 3,598 3,961 4,305 29,900 2,001 2,727 3,224 3,601 3,965 4,310 30,000 2,003 2,730 3,227 3,604 3,968 4,314

Click to view

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 418, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 330, § 11, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 365, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 100, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 255, § 20, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 430, § 9, effective July 14, 2000; 2019 ch. 162, § 2, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 47, § 2, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 122, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

403.2121.
Establishment of adjustment to child support obligations based upon parenting time — Authority to promulgate administrative regulations — Children receiving public assistance. [Effective until March 31, 2023]

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section or otherwise provided in this chapter, the child support obligation determined under KRS

403.212

shall be subject to further adjustment as follows:

If the parents share equal parenting time, the child support obligation determined under KRS

403.212

shall be divided between the parents in proportion to their combined monthly adjusted parental gross income, and the parent with the greater proportional child support obligation shall pay the parent with the lesser proportional obligation the difference in the value of each parent’s proportional obligation; and

If the parents share unequal parenting time under either a court-ordered time-sharing schedule or a time-sharing schedule exercised by agreement of the parties, the court shall:

Calculate the child support obligation set forth in the child support guidelines table in accordance with KRS 403.212;

Determine the percentage of overnight stays the child spends with each parent on an annual basis based upon the time-sharing order or agreement;

Multiply each parent’s support obligation as calculated under KRS 403.212 by the percentage of the other parent’s overnight stays as calculated in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph;

Set the difference between the amounts calculated in subparagraph 3. of this paragraph as the monetary transfer or credit necessary between the parents for the care of the child; and

Use its discretion in adjusting each parent’s child support obligation under this paragraph in accordance with the factors under KRS 403.212, and the following:

The obligated parent’s low income and ability to maintain the basic necessities of the home for the child;

The likelihood that either parent will actually exercise the time- sharing schedule set forth in the court-ordered time-sharing schedule or time-sharing agreement between the parents;

Whether all of the children are exercising the same time-sharing schedule; and

Whether the time-sharing plan results in fewer overnights due to a significant geographical distance between the parties that may affect the child support obligation.

As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise, an “overnight stay” shall include the costs associated with feeding and transporting the child, entertainment, attending to school work, athletic events, extracurricular activities, or other expenses that transfer with the child as they move from one parent to the other. Merely providing a child with a place to sleep in order to obtain an adjustment in a child support obligation shall not constitute an overnight stay under this section.

The child support calculations required under this section shall be on a worksheet prescribed by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services in administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A.

This section shall not apply if the child or children subject to the child support award receive public assistance, including KCHIP, K-TAP, food stamps, or Medicaid.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 47, § 3, effective March 1, 2022.

403.2121.
“Day” defined — Minimum requirement for shared parenting time credit — Establishment of adjustment to child support obligations based upon parenting time — Modification of child support — Children receiving public assistance. [Effective March 31, 2023]

For purposes of this section, “day”:

Means more than twelve (12) consecutive hours in a twenty-four (24) hour period under the care, control, or direct supervision of one (1) parent or caretaker, or as the court determines based on findings of substantially equivalent care or expense; and

Unless the context requires otherwise, includes housing, entertaining, feeding, and transporting the child, attending to school work, athletic events, extracurricular activities, or other activities that transfer with the child as he or she moves from one parent to the other.

In order to receive a shared parenting time credit, a parent shall maintain care, custody, and control over the child for a minimum of seventy-three (73) days per year, as defined by this section.

The shared parenting time credit shall only be applicable for parenting time that is court-ordered or approved and consistently exercised.

Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section or otherwise provided in this chapter, the child support obligation determined under KRS

403.212

shall be subject to further adjustment as follows:

For parents who share parenting time under either a court-ordered time-sharing schedule or a time-sharing schedule exercised by agreement of the parties, the court shall:

Calculate the child support obligation set forth in the child support guidelines table in accordance with KRS

403.212

(5)(a) using the combined gross adjusted income of the parties;

If both parents exercise their equal shared parenting time, consider the parent with the higher gross monthly income the obligor;

Determine the number of days for both parents on an annual basis based upon either a court-ordered time-sharing schedule or a time-sharing schedule exercised by agreement of the parties;

Using the days a child spends with the obligated parent, determine the adjustment percentage using the shared parenting time credit chart in subsection (4) of this section;

Determine the shared parenting time credit adjustment by multiplying the obligated parent’s adjustment percentage by the total support obligation found on the child support obligation worksheet to establish the shared parenting expense adjustment for the obligated parent, as determined in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph; and

Subtract the amount calculated in subparagraph 4. of this paragraph from the obligated parent’s monthly obligation, found on the child support obligation worksheet, as determined in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph;

The court may use its discretion in adjusting each parent’s child support obligation under this paragraph in accordance with the factors proscribed in this section, and the following:

The obligated parent’s low income and ability to maintain the basic necessities of the home for the child;

The likelihood that either parent will actually exercise the time-sharing schedule set forth in the court-ordered time-sharing schedule or time-sharing agreement between the parents;

Whether all of the children are subject to the same time-sharing schedule;

Whether the time-sharing plan results in fewer overnights due to a significant geographical distance between the parties that may affect the child support obligation; and

The military deployment or extended service obligations of the parties; and

The self-support reserve, as calculated under KRS 403.212(5)(b), and the shared parenting time credit, as calculated under this subsection, shall not be applied together. The obligor shall be responsible for the lesser support amount as determined under KRS 403.212(5)(c).

The shared parenting time credit chart is as follows:

Failure by one (1) party to consistently comply with the parenting schedule shall be grounds for the other party to seek modification from the court. A party may seek modification following a fifteen percent (15%) change in the number of timesharing days and shall have the burden of proving a material change in circumstances.

This section shall not apply if the child or children subject to the child support award receive public assistance, including:

Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program (KCHIP);

Kentucky Transitional Assistance Program (K-TAP);

Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP); or

Medicaid.

Parenting Time Days Adjustment Percentage 73-87 10.5% 88-115 15% 116-129 20.5% 130-142 25% 143-152 30.5% 153-162 36% 163-172 42% 173-181 48.5% 182-182.5 50%

Click to view

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 47, § 3, effective March 1, 2022; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 122, § 2, effective March 31, 2023.

403.213.
Criteria for modification of orders for child support and for health care — Effects of emancipation and death of obligated parent — Commission to review guidelines.

The Kentucky child support guidelines may be used by the parent, custodian, or agency substantially contributing to the support of the child as the basis for periodic updates of child support obligations and for modification of child support orders for health care. The provisions of any decree respecting child support may be modified only as to installments accruing subsequent to the filing of the motion for modification and only upon a showing of a material change in circumstances that is substantial and continuing.

Application of the Kentucky child support guidelines to the circumstances of the parties at the time of the filing of a motion or petition for modification of the child support order which results in equal to or greater than a fifteen percent (15%) change in the amount of support due per month shall be rebuttably presumed to be a material change in circumstances. Application which results in less than a fifteen percent (15%) change in the amount of support due per month shall be rebuttably presumed not to be a material change in circumstances. For the one (1) year period immediately following enactment of this statute, the presumption of material change shall be a twenty-five percent (25%) change in the amount of child support due rather than the fifteen percent (15%) stated above.

Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the decree, provisions for the support of a child shall be terminated by emancipation of the child unless the child is a high school student when he reaches the age of eighteen (18). In cases where the child becomes emancipated because of age, but not due to marriage, while still a high school student, the court-ordered support shall continue while the child is a high school student, but not beyond completion of the school year during which the child reaches the age of nineteen (19) years. Provisions for the support of the child shall not be terminated by the death of a parent obligated to support the child. If a parent obligated to pay support dies, the amount of support may be modified, revoked, or commuted to a lump-sum payment, to the extent just and appropriate in the circumstances. Emancipation of the child shall not terminate the obligation of child support arrearages that accrued while the child was an unemancipated minor.

The child support guidelines table shall be reviewed at least once every four (4) years by a commission consisting of the following persons:

The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or a supervisory staff person designated by him;

Two (2) members of the Kentucky Bar Association who have at least six (6) consecutive years’ experience and are presently practicing domestic relations cases, one (1) member from a metropolitan or large urban area and one (1) member from a less populated area;

Two (2) Circuit Judges appointed by the Chief Justice of the Kentucky Supreme Court, one (1) from a metropolitan or large urban area, and one (1) from a less populated area;

One (1) District Judge appointed by the Chief Justice of the Kentucky Supreme Court;

Two (2) county attorneys appointed by the president of the County Attorneys Association, one (1) from a metropolitan or large urban area and one (1) from a less populated area;

The Attorney General or his designee, who shall be an attorney from his office;

One (1) person who is a custodial parent;

One (1) person who is a noncustodial parent;

One (1) person who is a parent with split custody; and

One (1) child advocate.

The members designated in paragraphs (g) to (j) of this subsection shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) names for each category submitted by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. If the status of one (1) of these members changes, the member shall be replaced through appointment by the Governor from a list of three (3) names submitted by the cabinet.

The commission shall make a recommendation to the Kentucky General Assembly to ensure that the child support guidelines table results in a determination of appropriate child support amounts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 418, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 434, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 330, § 12, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 580, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 430, § 10, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 161, § 1, effective March 21, 2001; 2005, ch. 99, § 625, effective June 20, 2005.

403.215.
Assignment of wages for child support obligations.

After July 15, 1990, any new or modified order or decree which contains provisions for the support of a minor child or minor children, shall provide for a wage assignment which shall begin immediately except for good cause shown, and which shall be paid based upon the payment schedule of wages of the employer to whom the wage assignment is directed, and at a minimum, on a monthly basis. If good cause is shown, the wage assignment shall take effect when an arrearage accrues that is equal to the amount of support payable for one (1) month, pursuant to KRS

405.465

. Notice of all orders providing for wage assignment issued in Kentucky on or after January 1, 1994, shall be sent to the employer using the federally approved Income Withholding for Support (IWO) form that contains the accompanying OMB number.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 487, § 11, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 411, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 418, § 14, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 255, § 50, effective July 15, 1998; 2019 ch. 162, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.

Opinions of Attorney General.

KRS

205.741

(now repealed) and

405.465

require immediate and automatic wage assignment in all child support orders issued after July 15, 1988, unless the court has found in its judicial discretion that the basis exists for a good cause exception. In addition, this section requires the inclusion within every order or decree of dissolution containing provisions for child support issued after July 15, 1988, the notice that a wage assignment may issue if an arrearage accrues equal to one month.

OAG 88-84

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Motion for Wage Assignment, Form 263.11.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, 1991 Supp., Custody of Children, § 27.3.

403.220.
Costs of action and attorney’s fees.

The court from time to time after considering the financial resources of both parties may order a party to pay a reasonable amount for the cost to the other party of maintaining or defending any proceeding under this chapter and for attorney’s fees, including sums for legal services rendered and costs incurred prior to the commencement of the proceeding or after entry of judgment. The court may order that the amount be paid directly to the attorney, who may enforce the order in his name.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 12.

403.230.
Legal separation — Court may convert, to a decree of dissolution — Restoration of former name.

No earlier than one (1) year after entry of a decree of legal separation, the court on motion of either party shall convert the decree to a decree of dissolution of marriage.

Upon request by a wife whose marriage is dissolved or declared invalid, the court may, and if there are no children of the parties shall, order her maiden name or a former name restored.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 13.

403.240.
Decree or temporary order — Failure to comply with — Good-cause defense — Attorney’s fees.

If a party fails to comply with a provision of a decree or temporary order or injunction, the obligation of the other party to make payments for support or maintenance or to permit visitation is not suspended; but he may move the court to grant an appropriate order.

The failure of either party, without good cause, to comply with a provision of a decree or temporary order or injunction, including a provision with respect to visitation or child support shall constitute contempt of court, and the court shall remedy the failure to comply.

Good cause not to comply with a provision of a decree or temporary order or injunction with respect to visitation shall include mutual consent of the parties, reasonable belief by either party that there exists the possibility of endangerment to the physical, mental, moral, or emotional health of the child, or endangerment to the physical safety of either party, or extraordinary circumstances as determined by the court.

The court may, if no reasonable cause is found for denial of visitation, award attorney’s fees to the prevailing party.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 14; 1980, ch. 188, § 286, effective July 15, 1980; 1992, ch. 414, § 2, effective July 14, 1992.

403.250.
Modification or termination of provisions for maintenance and property disposition.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6) of KRS

403.180

, the provisions of any decree respecting maintenance may be modified only upon a showing of changed circumstances so substantial and continuing as to make the terms unconscionable. The provisions as to property disposition may not be revoked or modified, unless the court finds the existence of conditions that justify the reopening of a judgment under the laws of this state.

Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the decree, the obligation to pay future maintenance is terminated upon the death of either party or the remarriage of the party receiving maintenance.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 15; 1990, ch. 418, § 5, effective July 13, 1990.